Massachusetts, session 194th, H1305.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. An individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug
coverage in the state must permit and apply a pro-rated daily cost-sharing rate to prescriptions
that are dispensed by a network pharmacy for a partial supply if the prescriber or pharmacist
determines the fill or refill to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or
agrees to a partial supply for the purpose of synchronizing the patient’s medications.
No individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage shall
deny coverage for the dispensing of a medication that is dispensed by a network pharmacy on the
basis that the dispensing is for a partial supply if the prescriber or pharmacist determines the fill
or refill to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial
of 2

supply for the purpose of synchronizing the patient’s medications. The individual or group health
plan must allow a pharmacy to override any denial codes indicating that a prescription is being
refilled too soon for the purposes of medication synchronization.
No individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage shall
use payment structures incorporating pro-rated dispensing fees. Dispensing fees for partially
filled or refilled prescriptions shall be paid in full for each prescription dispensed, regardless of
any pro-rated copay for the beneficiary or fee paid for alignment services.
of 2